Maryland, session 2025, SB0533.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–113.
(a) The investigating unit of a law enforcement agency shall immediately review
a complaint by a member of the public alleging police officer misconduct.
(b) An administrative charging committee shall review and make a determination
or ask for further review within 30 days after completion of the investigating unit’s review.
(c) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) (D) OF THIS SECTION,
FOR AN INCIDENT INVOLVING A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC AND A POLICE OFFICER,
THE process of review by:
(1) THE INVESTIGATING UNIT SHALL COMPLETE ITS INVESTIGATION
AND FORWARD ITS FINDINGS TO THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE
WITHIN 334 DAYS AFTER THE FILING OF A COMPLAINT BY A MEMBER OF THE PUBLIC;
(2) THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE SHALL REVIEW AND
MAKE A DETERMINATION OR ASK FOR FURTHER INVESTIGATION WITHIN 30 DAYS
AFTER RECEIPT OF THE INVESTIGATING UNIT’S FINDINGS; AND
(3) THE PROCESS OF REVIEW AND INVESTIGATION BY the investigating
unit through disposition by the administrative charging committee shall be completed
within 1 year and 1 day 395 DAYS after the [filing of a complaint by a citizen MEMBER OF
THE PUBLIC] DATE THAT THE APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL EMPLOYED BY THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY BECAME AWARE OF THE INCIDENT.
(D) (C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) (D) OF THIS SECTION, A
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL FILE ANY ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGES ARISING
OUT OF AN INVESTIGATION OF ALLEGED POLICE OFFICER MISCONDUCT THAT IS NOT
REQUIRED TO BE REVIEWED BY AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE
WITHIN 1 YEAR AND 1 DAY AFTER THE DATE THAT THE APPROPRIATE OFFICIAL
EMPLOYED BY THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, AS DETERMINED BY WRITTEN
POLICY OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, BECAME AWARE OF THE INCIDENT
THAT LED TO THE INVESTIGATION.

SENATE BILL 533 3
(E) (D) IF ALLEGED POLICE OFFICER MISCONDUCT IS RELATED TO
ACTIVITY THAT REASONABLY APPEARS TO BE THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL
INVESTIGATION, AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY SHALL FILE ANY ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGES WITHIN 1 YEAR
AND 1 DAY AFTER THE DATE OF:
(1) THE INVESTIGATING LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S TIMELY
DETERMINATION THAT THE MATTER IS NOT RELATED TO CRIMINAL ACTIVITY;
(2) THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF ALL RELATED CRIMINAL CHARGES
FILED AGAINST THE POLICE OFFICER; OR
(3) THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE’S OR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY’S RECEIPT OF TIMELY NOTICE THAT THE APPROPRIATE
PROSECUTORIAL AUTHORITY DECLINED TO FILE CRIMINAL CHARGES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.